Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.125

Regents—Board organization—President—President's duties—Bylaws, laws.

The board of regents shall meet and organize by the election of a president from their own number on or as soon as practicable after the first Wednesday in April of each year.

The board president shall be the chief executive officer of the board and shall preside at all meetings thereof, except that in his or her absence the board may appoint a chair pro tempore. The board president shall sign all instruments required to be executed by said board other than those for the disbursement of funds.

The board may adopt bylaws for its own organizational purposes and enact laws for the government of the university and its properties.

[ 2011 c 336 s 721; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.30.125. Prior: (i) 1955 c 346 s 1, part; 1909 c 97 p 246 s 6, part; RRS s 4577, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.110, part. (ii) 1909 c 97 p 247 s 7, part; RRS s 4578, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 196, part; 1891 c 145 s 7, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.120, part. (iii) 1909 c 97 p 249 s 16, part; RRS s 4596, part; prior: 1897 c 118 s 205, part; 1891 c 145 s 19, part. Formerly RCW 28.80.160, part.]